tests/verbs.yaml
 "Verb akkamm":
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><prf> : akkamissidosona
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><intr><imfr> : akkamissiyonaa
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><intr><prf> : akkamissibeennee
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><prf> : akkamissibeenna
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><prf> : akkamissidee
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><imfr> : akkamissii
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><prf> : akkamissiis
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><prf> : akkamissiisi
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><neg><imfr> : akkamissokkona
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><neg><intr><imfr> : akkamissokkonaa
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><imfr> : akkamissoosona
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><opt> : akkamisso
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><opt> : akkamissona
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><opt> : akkamissoppo
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><neg><opt> : akkamissoppona
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><fem><opt> : akkamissu
   akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><fem><neg><imfr> : akkamissukku

 "Verb anjj":
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : anjissiyoge$
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><voc> : anjissiyogeetoo
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><abs> : anjissiyogaa
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl> : anjissiyogaa
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+kko<post> : anjissiyogaa$
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : anjissiyogaani
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : anjissiyogaa$
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ra<post> : anjissiyogaara
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : anjissiyogaa$
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+daani<post> : anjissiyog$
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><inter> : anjissiyogee
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><nom> : anjissiyogee
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : anjissiyogoo
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : anjissiyora
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : anjissiyoree
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><inter> : anjissiyori
   anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl> : anjissiyori

 "Verb att":
    att<v><iv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : attiis
    att<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : ashshiis

 "Verb att":
   att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : ashshiyageetuppe
   att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ra<post> : ashshiyageetura
   att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : ashshiyageetussi
   att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : ashshiyageetudaani
   att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><voc> : ashshiyageetoo
   att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><abs> : ashshiyagaa
   att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl> : ashshiyagaa

 "Verb awaajj":
   awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : awaajjiisi
   awaajj<v><tv><p3><plr><neg><imfr> : awaajjokkona
   awaajj<v><tv><p3><plr><neg><intr><imfr> : awaajjokkonaa
   awaajj<v><tv><p3><plr><imfr> : awaajjoosona
   awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><opt> : awaajjo
   awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><opt> : awaajjona
   awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><neg><opt> : awaajjoppo
   awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><neg><opt> : awaajjoppona
   awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><opt> : awaajju
   awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><neg><imfr> : awaajjukku
   awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><neg><opt> : awaajjuppu

 "Verb awcaya":
   awcaya<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+kko<post> : awcayaissi$
   awcaya<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : awcayaissiy$
   awcaya<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : awcayaissi$
   awcaya<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ra<post> : awcayaissiy$
   awcaya<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : awcayaissi$

 "Verb ayy":
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><abs> : ayissidaro
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><abs> : ayissidogeeta
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><inter> : ayissidogeetee
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><nom> : ayissidogeeti
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl> : ayissidogeetu
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+kko<post> : ayissidogeetukko
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ni<post> : ayissidogeetuni
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : ayissidogeetuppe
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ra<post> : ayissidogeetura
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : ayissidogeetussi
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : ayissidogeetud$
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><voc> : ayissidogeetoo
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><abs> : ayissidogaa
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl> : ayissidogaa
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+kko<post> : ayissidogaakko
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : ayissidogaani
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : ayissidogaappe
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ra<post> : ayissidogaara
   ayy<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : ayissidogaassi

 "Verb azalss":
   azalss<v><tv><fut> : azalssana
   azalss<v><tv><inf><abs> : azalssana
   azalss<v><tv><inf><abs><sg> : azalssanaa
   azalss<v><tv><inf><inter> : azalssanee
   azalss<v><tv><inf><nom><sg> : azalssanai
   azalss<v><tv><inf><obl> : azalssana
   azalss<v><tv><inf><obl><sg> : azalssanaa
   azalss<v><tv><intr><fut> : azalssanne
   azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p1><sing> : azalssada
   azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p2><sing> : azalssada
   azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p3><sing><fem> : azalssada
   azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p1><plr> : azalssidi
   azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p2><plr> : azalssidi
   azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p3><plr> : azalssidi
   azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p3><sing><masc> : azalssidi
   azalss<v><tv><p1><sing><prf> : azalssaasi

 "Verb bayzz":
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><fem><neg><intr><prf> : bayzissabeekkee
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><neg><fem><prf> : bayzissabeukku
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><fem><intr><prf> : bayzissadee
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><fem><imfr> : bayzissawsu
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><fem><intr><imfr> : bayzissay
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><imfr> : bayzissees
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><fem><neg><intr><imfr> : bayzissekkee
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><imfr> : bayzissenna
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><intr><imfr> : bayzissennee
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><neg><intr><prf> : bayzissibeokkonaa
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><neg><prf> : bayzissibeokkona
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><intr><prf> : bayzissidonaa
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><prf> : bayzissidosona
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><intr><imfr> : bayzissiyonaa
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><intr><prf> : bayzissibeennee
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><prf> : bayzissibeenna
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><prf> : bayzissidee
   bayzz<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><imfr> : bayzissii

 "Verb doom":
    doom<v><iv><p1><sing><neg><imfr> : doomikke
    doom<v><iv><p1><sing><neg><intr><imfr> : doomikkinaa
    doom<v><iv><p1><sing><intr><imfr> : doomiyanaa
    doom<v><iv><p1><plr><neg><imfr> : doomokko

 "Verb han":
    han<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><neg><imfr> : hanukku
    han<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><neg><opt> : hanuppu

 "Verb hem":
    hem<v><tv><p2><plr><intr><prf> : hemidetii

 "Verb han":
    han<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><neg><imfr> : hanukku
    han<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><neg><opt> : hanuppu

 "Verb oyshett":
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : oyshetissiyageetudaani
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : oyshetissiyageetudan
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><nom> : oyshetissiyageeti
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><inter> : oyshetissiyageetee
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><voc> : oyshetissiyageetoo
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : oyshetissiyagoo
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : oyshetissiyara
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : oyshetissiyaree
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+kko<post> : oyshetissiyarikko
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : oyshetissiyarin
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : oyshetissiyarini
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ppe<post> : oyshetissiyarippe
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ra<post> : oyshetissiyarira
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ssi<post> : oyshetissiyarissi
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl> : oyshetissiyari
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+daani<post> : oyshetissiyaridaani
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+daani<post> : oyshetissiyaridan
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><inter> : oyshetissiyari
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><abs> : oyshetissiyaro
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><abs> : oyshetissiyogaa
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+kko<post> : oyshetissiyogaakko
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : oyshetissiyogaan
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : oyshetissiyogaani
    oyshett<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : oyshetissiyogaappe

 "Verb geeshsh": 
   geeshsh<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><neg><intr><imfr> : geeshshennee
    geeshsh<v><tv><p3><plr><neg><intr><prf> : geeshshibeokkonaa
    geeshsh<v><tv><p3><plr><neg><prf> : geeshshibeokkona
    geeshsh<v><tv><p3><plr><intr><prf> : geeshshidonaa
    geeshsh<v><tv><p3><plr><prf> : geeshshidosona
    geeshsh<v><tv><p3><plr><intr><imfr> : geeshshiyonaa
    geeshsh<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><neg><intr><prf> : geeshshibeennee
    geeshsh<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><neg><prf> : geeshshibeenna
    geeshsh<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><intr><prf> : geeshshidee
    geeshsh<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><intr><imfr> : geeshshii
